Hawaii statutes.
§431:10G-108 Penalties. Any person who
violates this article shall be subject to a citation by the police and shall be
subject to a nonsuspendable fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000,
thirty days imprisonment, a one year driver's license suspension, or any
combination thereof, for each violation.

Any person cited under this section shall have
an opportunity to present a good faith defense, including but not limited to
lack of knowledge or proof of insurance. The general penalty provision of this
section shall not apply to:

(1) Any operator of a motorcycle or motor scooter
owned by another person if the operator's own insurance covers such driving;

(2) Any operator of a motorcycle or motor scooter
owned by that person's employer during the normal scope of that person's
employment; or

(3) Any operator of a borrowed motorcycle or motor
scooter if the operator holds a reasonable belief that the subject vehicle is
insured. [L 1989, c 208, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 64, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next